Maryland, session 2025, HB0947.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Local Government
1–1321.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “RETAIL ESTABLISHMENT” MEANS A STORE, A FOOD
SERVICE FACILITY, OR ANY OTHER ESTABLISHMENT THAT PROVIDES BAGS TO ITS
CUSTOMERS AS A RESULT OF THE SALE OF A PRODUCT OR SERVICE, WHETHER
OPERATED FOR PROFIT OR NOT FOR PROFIT.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO ALL COUNTIES AND MUNICIPALITIES.
(C) IF A COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY ENACTS A LOCAL LAW THAT
AUTHORIZES OR REQUIRES A RETAIL ESTABLISHMENT TO CHARGE FOR A PAPER
CARRYOUT BAG THAT IT PROVIDES TO A CUSTOMER, THE CHARGE MAY NOT EXCEED
10 CENTS FOR EACH PAPER CARRYOUT BAG.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0947*

HOUSE BILL 947
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.